Hawaii statutes.
§76-49 Subpoenas, oaths. The merit
appeals board shall have such powers as may be provided by law with respect to
compelling the attendance of witnesses and administering oaths to witnesses,
and as to all matters within the scope of its authority the director and any
hearing officer shall have similar powers. [L 1955, c 274, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§3-27; HRS §76-49; am L 1994, c 56, §21; am L 2000, c 253, §29]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next